Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-211
Motion picture films; contracts for rental; deposits a trust fund; safekeeping.

Whenever money shall be deposited or advanced as security on a contract for the use or rental of motion picture films, reels or views, and to secure the performance of the contract or to be applied to payments upon such contract when due, such money, with interest accruing thereon, if any, until repaid or so applied, shall continue to be the money of the person, association or corporation making such deposit or advance and shall be a trust fund in the possession of the person, association or corporation with whom such deposit or advance shall be made, and shall be deposited in a bank or trust company within the State of Nebraska, and shall not be mingled with other funds or become an asset of such trustee.

Laws 1921, c. 196, § 1, p. 716;

C.S.1922, § 2468;

C.S.1929, § 36-212;

R.S.1943, § 36-211.